Maryland, session 2026, SB0396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–204.
(b) (2) The Board shall employ:
(i) a full–time executive director whose annual salary shall be fixed
by the Board as in a general county classified salary schedule, within pay grade 17;
(ii) a full–time administrator whose annual salary shall be fixed by
the Board as in a general county classified salary schedule, within pay grade 16;
(iii) two full–time secretaries whose annual salaries shall be fixed by
the Board as in a general county classified salary schedule, within pay grade 13;
– 1 –

Ch. 856 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(iv) a full–time chief inspector whose annual salary shall be fixed by
the Board as in a general county classified salary schedule, within non–represented pay
schedule [NR–05] NR–15 NR–12; and
(v) an attorney at an annual salary of $60,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –